Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Money Transmission Licenses.

Sec. 06.55.101.
License required.

A person may not engage in the business of money transmission or advertise, solicit, or hold the person out as providing money transmission unless the person

holds a money transmission license; or

is an authorized delegate of a person who holds a money transmission license.

A money transmission license is not transferable or assignable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.102.
Application for license.

A person applying for a money transmission license shall apply in a form and in a medium prescribed by the department. The application must state or contain

the legal name and residential and business addresses of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting the applicant’s business;

a list of any criminal convictions of the applicant and any material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the 10-year period next preceding the submission of the application;

a description of any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

a list of the applicant’s proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in money transmission or provide other money services;

a list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in money transmission or provide other money services and any license revocations, suspensions, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings affecting the applicant;

a sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable, and a sample form of payment instrument or instrument on which stored value is recorded, if applicable;

the name and address of any bank through which the applicant’s payment instruments and stored value will be paid;

a description of the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide money services; and

any other information the department reasonably requires with respect to the applicant.

If an applicant is a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, or another entity, the applicant shall also provide

the date of the applicant’s incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or formation;

if applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;

a brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded;

the legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, and the employment, in the 10-year period next preceding the submission of the application of each executive officer, manager, director, or person who has control of the applicant;

a list of any criminal convictions and material litigation in which any executive officer, manager, director, or person in control of the applicant has been involved in the 10-year period next preceding the submission of the application;

a copy of the applicant’s audited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year and, if available, for the two-year period next preceding the submission of the application;

a copy of the applicant’s unconsolidated financial statements for the current fiscal year, whether audited or not, and, if available, for the two-year period next preceding the submission of the application;

if the applicant is publicly traded, a copy of the most recent report filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 78m (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

if the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of

a corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation’s most recent report filed under 15 U.S.C. 78m (Securities Exchange Act of 1934); or

a corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of documentation that is similar to the documentation required by (A) of this paragraph and that is filed with the regulator of the parent corporation’s domicile outside the United States;

if the applicant has a registered agent in this state, the name and address of the applicant’s registered agent in this state; and

any other information the department reasonably requires with respect to the applicant.

A nonrefundable application fee and a license fee must accompany an application for a money transmission license. The license fee shall be refunded if the application is denied.

The department may waive a requirement of (a) and (b) of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information instead of the required information.

In this section,

“material litigation” means litigation that, according to generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to an applicant’s or a money transmission licensee’s financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the applicant’s or money transmission licensee’s annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records;

“money transmission license” does not include an approval under AS

06.55.103

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

Sec. 06.55.103.
Approval to engage in money transmission when licensed in another state.

A person who is licensed to engage in money transmission in at least one other state, with the approval of the department and under this section, may engage in money transmission, currency exchange, or both money transmission and currency exchange in this state without being licensed under AS

06.55.102

if

the state in which the person is licensed has enacted the Uniform Money Services Act or the department determines that the money transmission laws of the state in which the person is licensed are substantially similar to those imposed by this chapter;

the person submits to, and in the form required by, the department

in a record, an application for approval to engage in money transmission, currency exchange, or both money transmission and currency exchange in this state without being licensed under AS

06.55.102

;

a nonrefundable application fee;

a fee for the first year of operating with the approval given under this section; this fee shall be refunded if the application is denied; and

a certification of license history in the other state.

Before granting a person approval under this section to engage in money transmission, currency exchange, or both money transmission and currency exchange in this state, the department shall make findings and conclusions as required by regulation.

When an application for approval under this section is complete, the department shall promptly notify the applicant, in a record, of the date on which the request was determined to be complete, and

the department shall approve or deny the request within 120 days after that date; or

if the request is not approved or denied within 120 days after that date,

the request is approved; and

the approval takes effect as of the first business day after expiration of the 120-day period.

An applicant whose application under this section is denied by the department may appeal, within 30 days after receipt of the notice of the denial, and request a hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

Sec. 06.55.104.
Security.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a surety bond, a letter of credit, or another similar security acceptable to the department in the amount of $25,000 plus $5,000 for each location, not exceeding a total addition of $125,000, must accompany an application for a money transmission license.

Security must be in a form satisfactory to the department and payable to the state for the benefit of a claimant against the money transmission licensee to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the money transmission licensee with respect to money transmission.

The aggregate liability on a surety bond may not exceed the principal sum of the bond. A claimant against a money transmission licensee may maintain an action on the bond, or the department may maintain an action on behalf of the claimant.

A surety bond must cover claims for as long as the department specifies, but for at least five years after the money transmission licensee ceases to provide money services in this state. However, the department may permit the amount of security to be reduced or eliminated before the expiration of that time to the extent the amount of the money transmission licensee’s payment instruments or stored-value obligations outstanding in this state is reduced. The department may permit a money transmission licensee to substitute another form of security acceptable to the department for the security effective at the time the money transmission licensee ceases to provide money services in this state.

Instead of the security prescribed in this section, an applicant for a money transmission license or a money transmission licensee may provide security in a form prescribed by the department.

The department may increase the amount of security required to a maximum of $500,000 if the financial condition of a money transmission licensee requires the increase, as evidenced by reduction of net worth, financial losses, or other relevant criteria.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

Sec. 06.55.105.
Issuance of license.

When an application is filed under AS

06.55.102

, the department shall investigate the applicant’s financial condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general fitness. The department may conduct an on-site investigation of the applicant, the reasonable cost of which the applicant shall pay. The department shall issue a license to an applicant under AS

06.55.102

if the department finds that all of the following conditions have been fulfilled:

the applicant has complied with AS 06.55.102,

06.55.104

, and

06.55.107

; and

the financial condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant, and the competence, experience, character, and general fitness of the executive officers, managers, directors, and persons in control of the applicant indicate that it is in the interest of the public to permit the applicant to engage in money transmission.

When an application for an original money transmission license under AS

06.55.102

is complete, the department shall promptly notify the applicant in a record of the date on which the application was determined to be complete, and

the department shall approve or deny the application within 120 days after that date; or

if the application is not approved or denied within 120 days after that date,

the application is approved; and

the money transmission license takes effect as of the first business day after expiration of the 120-day period.

The department may for good cause extend the application period.

An applicant whose application under AS

06.55.102

is denied by the department under AS

06.55.101

—

06.55.107

may appeal, within 30 days after receipt of the notice of the denial, and request a hearing.

In this section, “money transmission license” does not include an approval under AS

06.55.103

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

For examinations, reports, and records, see 3 AAC 13, art. 3.

Sec. 06.55.106.
Renewal of license.

A money transmission licensee shall pay an annual renewal fee not later than 30 days before the anniversary of the issuance of the money transmission license or, if the last day is not a business day, on the next business day.

A money transmission licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal fee, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the department. The renewal report must state or contain

a copy of the money transmission licensee’s most recent audited annual financial statement or, if the money transmission licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent corporation or the money transmission licensee’s most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement;

the number and monetary amount of payment instruments and stored value sold by the money transmission licensee in this state that have not been included in a renewal report, and the monetary amount of payment instruments and stored value currently outstanding;

a description of each material change in information submitted by the money transmission licensee in its original license application that has not been reported to the department on any required report;

a list of the money transmission licensee’s permissible investments and a certification that the money transmission licensee continues to maintain permissible investments according to the requirements set out in AS

06.55.501

and

06.55.502

;

proof that the money transmission licensee continues to maintain adequate security as required by AS

06.55.104

; and

a list of the locations in this state where the money transmission licensee or an authorized delegate of the money transmission licensee engages in money transmission or provides other money services.

If a money transmission licensee does not file a renewal report or pay its renewal fee by the renewal date or any extension of time granted by the department, the department shall send the money transmission licensee a notice of suspension. Unless the money transmission licensee files the report and pays the renewal fee before expiration of 10 days after the notice is sent, the money transmission licensee’s license is suspended 10 days after the department sends the notice of suspension. The suspension shall be lifted if, within 20 days after its money transmission license is suspended, the money transmission licensee

files the report and pays the renewal fee; and

pays a late fee for each day after suspension that the department did not receive the renewal report and the renewal fee.

The department for good cause may grant an extension of the renewal date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.

Sec. 06.55.107.
Net worth.

A money transmission licensee shall maintain a net worth of at least $25,000 determined under generally accepted accounting principles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 13, art. 1.